Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.804

Copayments.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) Effective until July 1, 2025, the department must calculate a monthly copayment according to the following schedule:

If the household's income is:

Then the household's maximum monthly copayment is:

At or below 20 percent of the state median income

Waived to the extent allowable under federal law; otherwise, a maximum of $15

Above 20 percent and at or below 36 percent of the state median income

$65

Above 36 percent and at or below 50 percent of the state median income

$90

Above 50 percent and at or below 60 percent of the state median income

$165

(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department must calculate a monthly copayment according to the following schedule:

If the household's income is:

Then the household's maximum monthly copayment is:

At or below 20 percent of the state median income

Waived to the extent allowable under federal law; otherwise, a maximum of $15

Above 20 percent and at or below 36 percent of the state median income

$65

Above 36 percent and at or below 50 percent of the state median income

$90

Above 50 percent and at or below 60 percent of the state median income

$165

Above 60 percent and at or below 75 percent of the state median income

$215

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall adopt a copayment model for households with annual incomes above 75 percent of the state median income and at or below 85 percent of the state median income. The model must calculate a copayment for each household that is no greater than seven percent of the household's countable income within this income range.

(4) The department may adjust the copayment schedule to comply with federal law.

(5) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.

(6) This section does not apply to households eligible for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.808, 43.216.812, and 43.216.814.

[ 2024 c 67 s 3.]